tutorial-env/lib/python3.6/site-packages/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_bg_BG.dic
4б4щ1щ4
4щ1бщ4
щщв4
4в4щ1щ4
4щ1вщ4
щщг4
4г4щ1щ4
4щ1гщ4
щщд4
4д4щ1щ4
4щ1дщ4
щщж4
4ж4щ1щ4
4щ1жщ4
щщз4
4з4щ1щ4
4щ1зщ4
щщк4
4к4щ1щ4
4щ1кщ4
щщл4
4л4щ1щ4
4щ1лщ4
щщм4
4м4щ1щ4
4щ1мщ4
щщн4
4н4щ1щ4
4щ1нщ4
щщп4
4п4щ1щ4
4щ1пщ4
щщр4
4р4щ1щ4
4щ1рщ4
щщс4
4с4щ1щ4
4щ1сщ4
щщт4
4т4щ1щ4
4щ1тщ4
щщф4
4ф4щ1щ4
4щ1фщ4
щщх4
4х4щ1щ4
4щ1хщ4
щщц4
4ц4щ1щ4
4щ1цщ4
щщч4
4ч4щ1щ4
4щ1чщ4
щщш4
4ш4щ1щ4
4щ1шщ4
пбй4
4й4пб4
4пй2б4
пбв4
4в4пб4
4пвб4
пбг4
4г4пб4
4пгб4
пбд4
4д4пб4
4пдб4
пбж4
4ж4пб4
4пжб4
пбз4
4з4пб4
4пзб4
пбк4
4к4пб4
4пкб4
пбл4
4л4пб4
4плб4
пбм4
4м4пб4
4пмб4
пбн4
4н4пб4
4пнб4
пбр4
4р4пб4
4прб4
пбс4
4с4пб4
4псб4
пбт4
4т4пб4
4птб4
пбф4
4ф4пб4
4пфб4
пбх4
4х4пб4
4пхб4
пбц4
4ц4пб4
4пцб4
пбч4
4ч4пб4
4пчб4
пбш4
4ш4пб4
4пшб4
пбщ4
4щ4пб4
4пщб4
бпй4
4й4бп4
4бй2п4
бпв4
4в4бп4
4бвп4
бпг4
4г4бп4
4бгп4
бпд4
4д4бп4
4бдп4
бпж4
4ж4бп4
4бжп4
бпз4
4з4бп4
4бзп4
бпк4
4к4бп4
4бкп4
бпл4
4л4бп4
4блп4
бпм4
4м4бп4
4бмп4
бпн4
4н4бп4
4бнп4
бпр4
4р4бп4
4брп4
бпс4
4с4бп4
4бсп4
бпт4
4т4бп4
4бтп4
бпф4
4ф4бп4
4бфп4
бпх4
4х4бп4
4бхп4
бпц4
4ц4бп4
4бцп4
бпч4
4ч4бп4
4бчп4
бпш4
4ш4бп4
4бшп4
бпщ4
4щ4бп4
4бщп4
фвй4
4й4фв4
4фй2в4
фвб4
4б4фв4
4фбв4
фвг4
4г4фв4
4фгв4
фвд4
4д4фв4
4фдв4
фвж4
4ж4фв4
4фжв4
фвз4
4з4фв4
4фзв4
фвк4
4к4фв4
4фкв4
фвл4
4л4фв4
4флв4
фвм4
4м4фв4
4фмв4
фвн4
4н4фв4
4фнв4
фвп4
4п4фв4
4фпв4
фвр4
4р4фв4
4фрв4
фвс4
4с4фв4
4фсв4
фвт4
4т4фв4
4фтв4
фвх4
4х4фв4
4фхв4
фвц4
4ц4фв4
4фцв4
фвч4
4ч4фв4
4фчв4
фвш4
4ш4фв4
4фшв4
фвщ4
4щ4фв4
4фщв4
вфй4
4й4вф4
4вй2ф4
вфб4
4б4вф4
4вбф4
вфг4
4г4вф4
4вгф4
вфд4
4д4вф4
4вдф4
вфж4
4ж4вф4
4вжф4
вфз4
4з4вф4
4взф4
вфк4
4к4вф4
4вкф4
вфл4
4л4вф4
4влф4
вфм4
4м4вф4
4вмф4
вфн4
4н4вф4
4внф4
вфп4
4п4вф4
4впф4
вфр4
4р4вф4
4врф4
вфс4
4с4вф4
4всф4
вфт4
4т4вф4
4втф4
вфх4
4х4вф4
4вхф4
вфц4
4ц4вф4
4вцф4
вфч4
4ч4вф4
4вчф4
вфш4
4ш4вф4
4вшф4
вфщ4
4щ4вф4
4вщф4
тдй4
4й4тд4
4тй2д4
тдб4
4б4тд4
4тбд4
тдв4
4в4тд4
4твд4
тдг4
4г4тд4
4тгд4
тд4ж4
4ж4тд4
4тжд4
тд4з4
4з4тд4
4тзд4
тдк4
4к4тд4
4ткд4
тдл4
4л4тд4
4тлд4
тдм4
4м4тд4
4тмд4
тдн4
4н4тд4
4тнд4
тдп4
4п4тд4
4тпд4
тдр4
4р4тд4
4трд4
тдс4
4с4тд4
4тсд4
тдф4
4ф4тд4
4тфд4
тдх4
4х4тд4
4тхд4
тдц4
4ц4тд4
4тцд4
тдч4
4ч4тд4
4тчд4
тдш4
4ш4тд4
4тшд4
тдщ4
4щ4тд4
4тщд4
дтй4
4й4дт4
4дй2т4
дтб4
4б4дт4
4дбт4
дтв4
4в4дт4
4двт4
дтг4
4г4дт4
4дгт4
дтж4
4ж4дт4
4джт4
дтз4
4з4дт4
4дзт4
дтк4
4к4дт4
4дкт4
дтл4
4л4дт4
4длт4
дтм4
4м4дт4
4дмт4
дтн4
4н4дт4
4днт4
дтп4
4п4дт4
4дпт4
дтр4
4р4дт4
4дрт4
дтс4
4с4дт4
4дст4
дтф4
4ф4дт4
4дфт4
дтх4
4х4дт4
4дхт4
дтц4
4ц4дт4
4дцт4
дтч4
4ч4дт4
4дчт4
дтш4
4ш4дт4
4дшт4
дтщ4
4щ4дт4
4дщт4
сзй4
4й4сз4
4сй2з4
сзб4
4б4сз4
4сбз4
сзв4
4в4сз4
4свз4
сзг4
4г4сз4
4сгз4
сзд4
4д4сз4
4сд4з4
сзж4
4ж4сз4
4сжз4
сзк4
4к4сз4
4скз4
сзл4
4л4сз4
4слз4
сзм4
4м4сз4
4смз4
сзн4
4н4сз4
4снз4
сзп4
4п4сз4
4спз4
сзр4
4р4сз4
4срз4
сзт4
4т4сз4
4стз4
сзф4
4ф4сз4
4сфз4
сзх4
4х4сз4
4схз4
сзц4
4ц4сз4
4сцз4
сзч4
4ч4сз4
4счз4
сзш4
4ш4сз4
4сшз4
сзщ4
4щ4сз4
4сщз4
зсй4
4й4зс4
4зй2с4
зсб4
4б4зс4
4збс4
зсв4
4в4зс4
4звс4
зсг4
4г4зс4
4згс4
зсд4
4д4зс4
4здс4
зсж4
4ж4зс4
4зжс4
зск4
4к4зс4
4зкс4
зсл4
4л4зс4
4злс4
зсм4
4м4зс4
4змс4
зсн4
4н4зс4
4знс4
зсп4
4п4зс4
4зпс4
зср4
4р4зс4
4зрс4
зст4
4т4зс4
4зтс4
зсф4
4ф4зс4
4зфс4
зсх4
4х4зс4
4зхс4
зсц4
4ц4зс4
4зцс4
зсч4
4ч4зс4
4зчс4
зсш4
4ш4зс4
4зшс4
зсщ4
4щ4зс4
4зщс4
шжй4
4й4шж4
4шй2ж4
шжб4
4б4шж4
4шбж4
шжв4
4в4шж4
4швж4
шжг4
4г4шж4
4шгж4
шжд4
4д4шж4
4шд4ж4
шжз4
4з4шж4
4шзж4
шжк4
4к4шж4
4шкж4
шжл4
4л4шж4
4шлж4
шжм4
4м4шж4
4шмж4
шжн4
4н4шж4
4шнж4
шжп4
4п4шж4
4шпж4
шжр4
4р4шж4
4шрж4
шжс4
4с4шж4
4шсж4
шжт4
4т4шж4
4штж4
шжф4
4ф4шж4
4шфж4
шжх4
4х4шж4
4шхж4
шжц4
4ц4шж4
4шцж4
шжч4
4ч4шж4
4шчж4
шжщ4
4щ4шж4
4шщж4
жшй4
4й4жш4
4жй2ш4
жшб4
4б4жш4
4жбш4
жшв4
4в4жш4
4жвш4
жшг4
4г4жш4
4жгш4
жшд4
4д4жш4
4ждш4
жшз4
4з4жш4
4жзш4
жшк4
4к4жш4
4жкш4
жшл4
4л4жш4
4жлш4
жшм4
4м4жш4
4жмш4
жшн4
4н4жш4
4жнш4
жшп4
4п4жш4
4жпш4
жшр4
4р4жш4
4жрш4
жшс4
4с4жш4
4жсш4
жшт4
4т4жш4
4жтш4
жшф4
4ф4жш4
4жфш4
жшх4
4х4жш4
4жхш4
жшц4
4ц4жш4
4жцш4
жшч4
4ч4жш4
4жчш4
жшщ4
4щ4жш4
4жщш4
кгй4
4й4кг4
4кй2г4
кгб4
4б4кг4
4кбг4
кгв4
4в4кг4
4квг4
кгд4
4д4кг4
4кдг4
кгж4
4ж4кг4
4кжг4
кгз4
4з4кг4
4кзг4
кгл4
4л4кг4
4клг4
кгм4
4м4кг4
4кмг4
кгн4
4н4кг4
4кнг4
кгп4
4п4кг4
4кпг4
кгр4
4р4кг4
4крг4
кгс4
4с4кг4
4ксг4
кгт4
4т4кг4
4ктг4
кгф4
4ф4кг4
4кфг4
кгх4
4х4кг4
4кхг4
кгц4
4ц4кг4
4кцг4
кгч4
4ч4кг4
4кчг4
кгш4
4ш4кг4
4кшг4
кгщ4
4щ4кг4
4кщг4
гкй4
4й4гк4
4гй2к4
гкб4
4б4гк4
4гбк4
гкв4
4в4гк4
4гвк4
гкд4
4д4гк4
4гдк4
гкж4
4ж4гк4
4гжк4
гкз4
4з4гк4
4гзк4
гкл4
4л4гк4
4глк4
гкм4
4м4гк4
4гмк4
гкн4
4н4гк4
4гнк4
гкп4
4п4гк4
4гпк4
гкр4
4р4гк4
4грк4
гкс4
4с4гк4
4гск4
гкт4
4т4гк4
4гтк4
гкф4
4ф4гк4
4гфк4
гкх4
4х4гк4
4гхк4
гкц4
4ц4гк4
4гцк4
гкч4
4ч4гк4
4гчк4
гкш4
4ш4гк4
4гшк4
гкщ4
4щ4гк4
4гщк4
цчй4
4й4цч4
4цй2ч4
цчб4
4б4цч4
4цбч4
цчв4
4в4цч4
4цвч4
цчг4
4г4цч4
4цгч4
цчд4
4д4цч4
4цдч4
цчж4
4ж4цч4
4цжч4
цчз4
4з4цч4
4цзч4
цчк4
4к4цч4
4цкч4
цчл4
4л4цч4
4цлч4
цчм4
4м4цч4
4цмч4
цчн4
4н4цч4
4цнч4
цчп4
4п4цч4
4цпч4
цчр4
4р4цч4
4црч4
цчс4
4с4цч4
4цсч4
цчт4
4т4цч4
4цтч4
цчф4
4ф4цч4
4цфч4
цчх4
4х4цч4
4цхч4
цчш4
4ш4цч4
4цшч4
цчщ4
4щ4цч4
4цщч4
чцй4
4й4чц4
4чй2ц4
чцб4
4б4чц4
4чбц4
чцв4
4в4чц4
4чвц4
чцг4
4г4чц4
4чгц4
чцд4
4д4чц4
4чдц4
чцж4
4ж4чц4
4чжц4
чцз4
4з4чц4
4чзц4
чцк4
4к4чц4
4чкц4
чцл4
4л4чц4
4члц4
чцм4
4м4чц4
4чмц4
чцн4
4н4чц4
4чнц4
чцп4
4п4чц4
4чпц4
чцр4
4р4чц4
4чрц4
чцс4
4с4чц4
4чсц4
чцт4
4т4чц4
4чтц4
чцф4
4ф4чц4
4чфц4
чцх4
4х4чц4
4чхц4
чцш4
4ш4чц4
4чшц4
чцщ4
4щ4чц4
4чщц4
